Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2786HZ (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 2346 Section 1. Section 321J.2, subsection 7, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. All persons convicted of an offense under subsection 2 3 shall be ordered, at the personâs expense, to undergo , prior 4 to sentencing, a substance use disorder evaluation. The court 5 shall order the person to follow the recommendations proposed 6 in the substance use disorder evaluation as provided in section 7 321J.3 . 8